District of Columbia statutes.
15-705

Exemption of District of Columbia and United States from fees, costs, and bonds.

(a)

The District of Columbia or any officer thereof acting therefor may not be required to pay court costs or fees in any court in and for the District of Columbia.

(b)

The District of Columbia may not be required to pay fees to the clerk of the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia, or to the marshal of the District, and is entitled to the services of the marshal in the service of all civil process.

(c)

The United States and the District of Columbia may not be required to pay fees and costs for services rendered by the clerk of the United States District Court for the District of Columbia and the Register of Wills.

(d)

Neither the United States nor the District of Columbia, nor any officer of either acting in his official capacity, may be required to give bond or enter into undertaking to perfect an appeal or to obtain an injunction or other writ, process, or order in or of any court in the District of Columbia for which a bond or undertaking is required by law or rule of court.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 532, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-705.
1973 Ed., § 15-705.